Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
DISTRIBUTIONS AND RESIGNATION

Law reviews:

For article, "Limited Liability

C

ompanies: Structuring Members' Economic Rights", see 34

C

olo. Law. 73 (Aug. 2005).

7-80-601. Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this part 6, a member is entitled to receive distributions from a limited liability company before the member's resignation from the limited liability company and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events stated in the operating agreement or as otherwise agreed by all of the members.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1505, § 18, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2267, § 186, effective July 1, 2004.

7-80-602. Resignation of member.

A member may resign from a limited liability company at any time by giving notice to the other members, but, if the resignation violates the operating agreement, the limited liability company may recover from the resigning member damages for breach of the operating agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to the resigning member.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 943, § 11, effective July 1.

7-80-603. Interest of member upon resignation.

A member who has resigned shall have no right to participate in the management of the business and affairs of the limited liability company and is entitled only to receive the share of the profits or other compensation by way of income and the return of contributions, to which such member would have been entitled if the member had not resigned.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 717, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 227, § 17, effective May 29.

7-80-604. Distribution in kind.

A member, regardless of the nature of the member's contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than cash. A member may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited liability company to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the member exceeds a percentage of that asset that is equal to the percentage in which the member shares in distributions from the limited liability company.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 718, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1460, § 185, effective July 1.

7-80-605. Right to distribution.

At the time a member becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member has the status of and is entitled to all remedies available to a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1461, § 186, effective July 1.

7-80-606. Limitations on distribution.

A limited liability company shall not make a distribution to a member to the extent that at the time of distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited liability company, other than liabilities to members on account of their membership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to a specific property of the limited liability company, exceed the fair value of the assets of the limited liability company; except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the limited liability company only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability. For purposes of this subsection (1), the term "distribution" shall not include payments to the extent that the payments do not exceed amounts equal to or constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

A member who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall be liable to the limited liability company for the amount of the distribution. A member who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (3) of this section, this subsection (2) shall not affect any obligation or liability of a member under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a member who receives a distribution from a limited liability company shall have no liability under this article or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three years from the date of the distribution unless an action to recover the distribution from such member is commenced prior to the expiration of the said three-year period and an adjudication of liability against such member is made in the said action.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 227, § 18, effective May 29.

7-80-607. Liability upon return of contribution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 432, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1) repealed, p. 718, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 943, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.